California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 51.5.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87743.1.

As used in this chapter, “faculty service area” means a service or instructional subject area or group of related services or instructional subject areas performed by faculty and established by a community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 52.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87743.2.

Not later than July 1, 1990, each community college district shall establish faculty service areas. The establishment of faculty service areas shall be within the scope of meeting and negotiating pursuant to Section 3543.2 of the Government Code. The exclusive representative shall consult with the academic senate in developing its proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 53.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87743.3.

Each faculty member shall qualify for one or more faculty service areas at the time of initial employment. A faculty member shall be eligible for qualification in any faculty service area in which the faculty member has met both minimum qualifications pursuant to Section 87356 and district competency standards. After initial employment, a faculty member may apply to the district to add faculty service areas for which the faculty member qualifies. The application shall be received by the district on or before February 15 in order to be considered in any proceeding pursuant to Section 87743 during the academic year in which the application is received. Any dispute arising from an allegation that a faculty member has been improperly denied a faculty service area shall be classified and procedurally addressed as a grievance. If the district has no grievance procedure, fair and equitable procedures for the resolution of the disputes shall be developed by the academic senate and representatives of the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 54.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87743.4.

Each district shall maintain a permanent record for each faculty member employed by the district of each faculty service area for which the faculty member possesses the minimum qualifications for service and in which he or she has established competency pursuant to district competency standards. The record shall be contained in the faculty member’s personnel file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 55.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87743.5.

To determine competency to serve in a faculty service area for the purposes of Section 87743, each community college district shall, not later than July 1, 1990, establish competency criteria for faculty members employed by the district. The development and establishment of such competency criteria shall be within the scope of meeting and negotiating pursuant to Section 3543 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 56.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87744.

Any regular employee whose services have been terminated, as provided in Section 87743, shall have the following rights:

(a) For the period of 39 months from the date of the termination, any employee who in the meantime has not attained the age of 70 years shall have the preferred right to reappointment, in the order of original employment as determined by the board in accordance with Sections 87405 to 87424, inclusive, if the number of employees is increased or the discontinued service is reestablished, with no requirements that were not imposed upon other employees who continued in service. However, no contract or other employee with less seniority shall be employed to render a service for which the employee meets minimum qualifications and is competent to render.

(b) The right to reappointment may be waived by the employee, without prejudice, for not more than one college year, unless the board extends this right, but such a waiver shall not deprive the employee of his or her right to subsequent offers of reappointment.

(c) As to any employee who is reappointed, the period of his or her absence shall be treated as a leave of absence and shall not be considered as a break in the continuity of his or her service, he or she shall retain the classification and order of employment he or she had when his or her services were terminated, and credit for prior service under any state or district retirement system shall not be affected by that termination, but the period of his or her absence shall not count as a part of the service required for retirement.

(d) During the period of his or her preferred right to reappointment, the employee, in the order of original employment, shall be offered prior opportunity for temporary service during the absence of any other employee who has been granted a leave of absence or who is temporarily absent from duty. However, his or her services may be terminated upon the return to duty of the other employee, the compensation he or she receives shall be not less than the amount he or she would receive if he or she were being reappointed, and that the temporary service shall not affect the retention of his or her previous classification and rights.

(e) At any time prior to the completion of one year after his or her return to service, he or she may continue or make up, with interest, his or her own contributions to any state or district retirement system, for the period of his or her absence, but it shall not be obligatory on a district to match these contributions.

(f) If the employee becomes disabled or reaches retirement age at any time before his or her return to service, he or she shall receive, in any state or district retirement system of which he or she was a member, all benefits to which he or she would have been entitled had the event occurred at the time of his or her termination of service, plus any benefits he or she may have qualified for thereafter, as though still employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87745.

Any contract employee whose services have been terminated as provided in Section 87743 shall have the following rights:

(a) For the period of 24 months from the date of the termination, any employee who in the meantime has not attained the age of 70 years shall have the preferred right to reappointment, subject to the prior rights to reappointment by all regular employees as set forth in Section 87744, in the order of original employment as determined by the governing board in accordance with Sections 87405 to 87424, inclusive, if the number of employees is increased or the discontinued service is reestablished, with no requirements that were not imposed upon other employees who continued in service. However, no contract or temporary employee with less seniority shall be employed to render a service for which the employee meets minimum qualifications and is competent to render.

(b) As to any employee who is reappointed, the period of his or her absence shall be treated as a leave of absence and shall not be considered as a break in the continuity of his or her service, he or she shall retain the classification and order of employment he or she had when his or her services were terminated, and credit for prior service under any state or district retirement system shall not be affected by the termination. However, the period of his or her absence shall not be counted as a part of the service required for attaining regular status in the district or, except as provided in subdivision (c), for retirement purposes.

(c) During the period of his or her preferred right to reappointment, the employee, in the order of original employment and subject to the rights of regular employees as set forth in Section 87744, shall be offered prior opportunity for temporary service during the absence of any other employee who has been granted leave of absence or who is temporarily absent from duty. However, his or her services may be terminated upon a return to duty of the other employee, such temporary service shall not affect the retention of his or her previous classification and rights.

(d) At any time prior to the completion of one year after his or her return to service, an employee reappointed under this section may elect to continue or to reinstate his or her membership and interest in any state or district retirement system and to receive retirement benefits as if no absence from service had occurred. In the event of such an election, the employee shall pay into the retirement system the amount of his or her share of contribution and the district’s share of contribution attributable to the period of absence and the amount of any contributions withdrawn, plus interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87746.

If the services of any contract employee are terminated, or if such an employee is dismissed, because of a reduction in the attendance of students or the discontinuance of a particular kind of service, and the employee is reemployed within a period of 39 months from the last day of the college year within which his or her service was so terminated, or within 39 months after the cessation of hostilities, if the reduction in attendance or discontinuance of service was due to war conditions, the period of the employee’s absence shall not count as a part of the service required as a condition precedent to the classification of the employee as a regular employee of the district, but the absence shall not be construed as a break in the continuity of the service of the employee.

Every contract employee who has been reemployed as indicated in this section shall have all of the rights enumerated in Section 87463 and Sections 87743 to 87762, inclusive, for regular employees, except the right of reappointment, subject only to the prior rights of regular employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Leaves of Absence [87762. - 87790.]

87762.

In specifying or defining the rights of employees in Section 87746, “war” means “war” as defined in Section 22804.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87763.

Governing boards of community college districts may grant leaves of absence to persons employed in academic positions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 136.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87764.

When any provision of this code expressly authorizes or requires the governing board of a community college district to grant a leave of absence for any purpose or for any period of time to persons employed in academic positions, that express authorization or requirement does not deprive the governing board of the power to grant leaves of absence with or without pay to those employees for other purposes or for other periods of time, so long as the governing board does not deprive any employee of any leave of absence to which he or she is entitled by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87765.

The governing board of a community college district may provide for the leave of absence from duty and may grant compensation during the leave of absence to any employee of the district who is employed in an academic position and who is compelled to absent himself or herself from his or her duties because of accident or illness, whether or not the cause of absence arises out of and in the course of the employment of the employee, or because of quarantine which results from his or her contact with other persons having a contagious disease while performing his or her duties, or because of temporary inability to perform the services required of him or her because of illness, accident, or quarantine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 138.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87766.

The governing board of a community college district shall provide for leave of absence from duty for any academic employee of the district who is required to be absent from duties because of pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician.

Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by any school district.

Except as provided herein, written and unwritten employment policies and practices of a community college district shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.

This section shall be construed as requiring the governing board of a community college district to grant leave with pay only when it is necessary to do so in order that leaves of absence for disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth be treated the same as leaves for illness, injury, or disability.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 23.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 24 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

87766.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district shall provide for a leave of absence from duty for an academic employee of the community college district who is required to be absent from duty because the employee is experiencing or has experienced pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the leave of absence shall be with full pay, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks. The paid leave may begin before and continue after childbirth if the employee is actually disabled by
 pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions.

(2) For part-time academic employees, the amount of paid leave per week, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks, shall be calculated in accordance with the following:

(A) If the part-time employee works a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay for the total number of hours the employee is normally scheduled to work for the community college district.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), if the part-time employee does not work a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the six-month period immediately preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(ii) If the part-time employee has been employed for less than six months, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the entire period of that employment preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district shall maintain group health coverage for an employee who takes a leave of absence under this section for the duration of the leave of absence at the same level and under the same conditions that coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken a leave of absence.

(4) A leave of absence taken under this section shall not be deducted from any other leaves of absence available to the employee for subsequent injury, illness, or disabilities, including those caused or
 contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth, pursuant to state or federal regulations or laws, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(5) Compensation during the leave of absence taken under this section shall include retirement fund contributions required of the community college district. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions to the retirement fund.

(b) Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities, and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by a community college district.

(c) Except as
 provided in this section, written and unwritten employment policies and practices of a community college district shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.

(d) Except as provided in this section, there are no eligibility requirements, including, but not limited to, minimum hours worked or length of service, before an employee disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions is eligible for a paid leave of absence under this section.

(e) A community college district that has elected to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code pursuant to Section 710.4 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may apply the disability benefits of an employee under Part 2 (commencing with Section
 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code in partial satisfaction of the requirements of this section. Full satisfaction of the requirements of this section is met if the employer ensures that the employee receives the full amount of pay during the leave of absence required by this section without a reduction to the vacation, sick, or other compensated leave time balances of the employee.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a community college district to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a community college district and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater disability or parental leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.

(g) This section
 shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 24.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

87767.

The governing board of a community college district may grant any employee of the district employed in an academic position, a leave of absence not to exceed one year for the purpose of permitting study or travel by the employee which will benefit the schools and students of the district. The governing board may provide that such a leave of absence be taken in separate six-month periods or separate quarters rather than for a continuous one-year period, provided that the leave of absence for both of the separate six-month periods or any or all quarters shall be commenced and completed within a three-year period. Any period of service by the individual intervening between the two separate six-month periods or separate quarters of the leave of absence shall comprise a part of the service required for a subsequent leave of absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 140.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87768.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the governing board of any community college district may grant a leave of absence under Section 87767 to any academic employee who has rendered service to the district for at least six consecutive years preceding the granting of the leave, but not more than one such leave of absence shall be granted in each six-year period. The governing board granting the leave of absence may prescribe the standards of service which shall entitle the employee to the leave of absence. No absence from the service of the district under a leave of absence, other than a leave of absence granted pursuant to Section 87767, granted by the governing board of the district shall be deemed a break in the continuity of service required by this section, and the period of the absence shall not be included as service in computing the six consecutive years of service required by this section. Service under a national recognized fellowship or foundation approved by the board of governors, for a period of not more than one year, for research, teaching or lecturing shall not be deemed a break in continuity of service, and the period of the absence shall be included in computing the six consecutive years of service required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 141.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87768.5.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district shall grant to any employee, upon request, a leave of absence without loss of compensation for the purpose of enabling the employee to serve as an elected officer of any local community college district public employee organization, or of any statewide or national public employee organization with which the local organization is affiliated.

(2) The leave shall include, but is not limited to, absence for purposes of attendance by the employee at periodic, stated, special, or regular meetings of the body of the organization on which the employee serves as an officer. Compensation during the leave shall include retirement fund contributions required of the community college district as employer. The required employer contribution rate shall be the rate adopted by the Teachers’ Retirement Board as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program as provided in Section 22711. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave
 of absence and shall pay member contributions as prescribed by Section 22711. Any employee who serves as a full-time officer of a public employee organization shall not be eligible for disability benefits under the State Teachers’ Retirement System while on the leave of absence.

(3) Following the community college district’s payment of the employee for the leave of absence, the community college district shall
 be reimbursed by the employee organization of which the employee is an elected officer for all compensation paid the employee on account of the leave. Reimbursement by the employee organization shall be made within 10 days after its receipt of the community college district’s certification of payment of compensation to the employee.

(4) The leave of absence without loss of compensation provided for by this section is in addition to the released time without loss of compensation granted to representatives of an exclusive representative by subdivision (c) of Section 3543.1 of the Government
 Code. The leave provided under this section shall be in addition to any leave to which public employees may be entitled by other laws or by a memorandum of understanding or collective bargaining agreement. 

(b) (1) An employee who after August 31, 1978, was absent on account of elected-officer service, shall receive full service credit in the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan, provided that both of the following conditions are met: 

(A) The employee makes a written request to the employer for a leave of absence for the period of the elected-officer service.

(B) The employee organization of which the member is
 an elected officer pays to the member’s employer an amount equal to the required State Teachers’ Retirement Plan member and employer retirement contributions, including regular interest on the balance of contributions due to the State Teachers’ Retirement System, calculated from the date the contributions would have been due when the elected-officer service was performed to the date payment is received by the State Teachers’ Retirement System, compounded daily based on the regular interest rate in effect the day the payment is received by the State Teachers’ Retirement System, as prescribed by this section. 

(2) The community college district, following this written request and payment, shall transmit the amount received to the State Teachers’ Retirement System, informing it of the period of the employee’s leave of absence. The State Teachers’ Retirement System shall credit the employee with all service credit earned for the period of the
 elected-officer leave of absence. 

(3) If the employee has been compensated by the school district for the period of the service, then, as a condition to the employee’s entitlement to service credit for this period, the school district shall be reimbursed by the employee organization for the amount of the compensation. 

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, this section shall apply retroactively to all service as an elected officer in a public employee organization occurring after August 31, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 539, Sec. 4.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

87769.

Every employee granted a leave of absence pursuant to Section 87767 may be required to perform such services during the leave as the governing board of the district and the employee may agree upon in writing, and the employee shall receive such compensation during the period of the leave as the governing board and the employee may agree upon in writing, which compensation shall be not less than the difference between the salary of the employee on leave and the salary of a substitute employee in the position which the employee held prior to the granting of the leave. However, in lieu of such difference, the board may pay one-half of the salary of the employee on leave or any additional amount up to and including the full salary of the employee on leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87769.5.

An employee granted a leave of absence pursuant to Section 87767 or 87768 may agree in writing with the governing board of the community college district not to receive compensation during the period of the leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87770.

Every employee, as a condition to being granted a leave of absence pursuant to Section 87767, shall agree in writing to render a period of service in the employ of the governing board of the district following his or her return from the leave of absence which is equal to twice the period of the leave. Compensation granted by the governing board to the employee on leave for less than one year may be paid during the first year of service rendered in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence or, in the event that the leave is for a period of one year, the compensation may be paid in two equal annual installments during the first two years of service following the return of the employee. The compensation shall be paid the employee while on the leave of absence in the same manner as if the employee were teaching in the district, upon the furnishing by the employee of a suitable bond indemnifying the governing board of the district against loss in the event that the employee fails to render the agreed upon period of service in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence. The bond shall be exonerated in event the failure of the employee to return and render the agreed upon period of service is caused by the death or physical or mental disability of the employee. If the governing board finds, and by resolution declares, that the interests of the district will be protected by the written agreement of the employee to return to the service of the district and render the agreed upon period of service therein following his or her return from the leave, the governing board may waive the furnishing of the bond and pay the employee on leave in the same manner as though a bond is furnished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87771.

If the employee does not serve for the entire period of service agreed upon under Section 87770, the amount of compensation paid for the leave of absence shall be reduced by an amount which bears the same proportion to the total compensation as the amount of time which was not served bears to the total amount of time agreed upon. If the employee furnished an indemnity bond, upon default, the proceeds of the bond shall be divided between the employee and the community college district in the same proportion as the actual amount of time served bears to the amount of time agreed upon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87774.

At the expiration of the leave of absence of the employee, the employee, unless he or she otherwise agrees, shall be reinstated in the position held by him or her at the time of the granting of the leave of absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 178.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87775.

Both the governing board of a community college district and the district shall be freed from any liability for the payment of any compensation or damages provided by law for the death or injury of any employee of the district employed in an academic position when the death or injury occurs while the employee is on any leave of absence granted under the provisions of Sections 87763 to 87779, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 144.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87776.

No leave of absence when granted to a contract employee shall be construed as a break in the continuity of service required for the classification of the employee as tenure. However, time spent on any unpaid leave of absence shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility for, tenure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 145.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87777.

Whenever any permanent or probationary employee of a high school district is employed by a community college district pursuant to Section 87462 or 87464 such employee shall be entitled to retain all sickness and injury, sabbatical and other leave rights accumulated by service prior to such employment and the district shall recognize and grant such rights, including any accumulated rights allowed by the governing board of the high school district, as fully as if there was no change in the community college district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87779.

When a community college or other place of employment shall have been transferred from one district to another, any academic employees who transfer with the school or other place of employment shall be entitled to retain all sickness and injury, sabbatical and other leave rights accumulated by service prior to the transfer and the district to which the school or other place of employment has been transferred shall recognize or grant those rights, including any accumulated rights allowed by the governing board of the district from which the school or other place of employment was transferred, as fully as if there had been no change in the district maintaining the school or other place of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 146.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87780.

When a person employed in an academic position is absent from his or her duties on account of illness or accident for a period of five school months or less, whether or not the absence arises out of or in the course of the employment of the employee, the amount deducted from the salary due the employee for any month in which the absence occurs shall not exceed the sum that is actually paid a temporary employee employed to fill his or her position during his or her absence or, if no temporary employee was employed, the amount that would have been paid to the temporary employee had he or she been employed. The community college district shall make every reasonable effort to secure the services of a temporary employee.

The governing board of every community college district shall adopt a salary schedule for temporary employees. The salary schedule shall indicate a salary for a temporary employee for all categories or classes of academic employees of the district.

 Except in a district where the governing board has adopted a salary schedule for temporary employees of the district, the amount paid the temporary employee during any month shall be less than the salary due the employee absent from his or her duties.

When a person employed in an academic position is absent from his or her duties on account of illness for a period of more than five school months, or when a person is absent from his or her duties for a cause other than illness, the amount deducted from the salary due the person for the month in which the absence occurs shall be determined according to the rules and regulations established by the governing board of the district. These rules and regulations shall not conflict with rules and regulations of the board of governors.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive any district, city, or city and county of the right to make any reasonable rule for the regulation of accident or sick leave or cumulative accident or sick leave without loss of salary for academic employees.

This section shall be applicable whether or not the absence from duty is by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of the employing district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 180.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87780.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, during each school year, a person employed in an academic position may use his or her sick leave for purposes of parental leave for a period of up to 12 workweeks.

(2) In community college districts that use the differential pay system described in Section 87780, when an employee has exhausted all available sick leave, including all accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent from his or her duties on account of parental leave pursuant to Section
 12945.2 of the Government Code, the amount deducted from the salary due him or her for any of the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period in which the absence occurs shall not exceed the sum that is actually paid a temporary employee employed to fill his or her position during his or her absence or, if no temporary employee was employed, the amount that would have been paid to the temporary employee had he or she been employed.

(3) In community college districts that use the differential pay system described in Section 87786, when an employee has exhausted all available sick leave, including all accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent from his or her duties on account of parental leave pursuant to Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, the employee shall be compensated at no less than 50 percent of the employee’s
 regular salary for the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period of parental leave.

(4) Regardless of the type of differential pay system used by the community college district pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3), the compensation a person employed in an academic position shall receive shall be no less than 50 percent of his or her regular salary for the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period of parental leave.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), all of the following apply:

(1) The 12-workweek period shall be reduced by any period of sick leave, including accumulated sick leave, taken during a period of parental leave.

(2) An employee shall not be
 provided more than one 12-workweek period for parental leave during any 12-month period.

(3) Parental leave taken pursuant to this section shall run concurrently with parental leave taken pursuant to Section 12945.2 of the Government Code. The aggregate amount of parental leave taken pursuant to this section and Section 12945.2 of the Government Code shall not exceed 12 workweeks in a 12-month period.

(c) This section shall be applicable whether or not the absence from duty is by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of the employing community college district.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, a person employed in an academic position is not
 required to have 1,250 hours of service with the employer during the previous 12-month period in order to take parental leave pursuant to this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a public school employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to
 Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater parental leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, “parental leave” means leave for reason of the birth of a child of the employee, or the placement of a child with an employee in connection with the adoption or foster care of the child by the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 994, Sec. 3.   (AB 2012)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

87781.

(a) (1) Every academic employee employed five days a week by a community college district shall be entitled to 10 days’ leave of absence for illness or injury and any additional days in addition thereto that the governing board may allow for illness or injury, exclusive of all days he or she is not required to render service to the district, with full pay for a college year of service.

(2) An employee employed for less than five schooldays a week shall be entitled, for a college year of service, to that proportion of 10 days’ leave of absence for illness or injury as the number of days he or she is employed per week bears to five, and is entitled to those additional days in addition thereto as the governing board may allow for illness or injury to academic employees employed for less than five schooldays per week. Pay for any day of those absences shall be the same as the pay that would have been received had the employee served during the day.
